th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > กรีฑา: ปลาปอมปาดัวร์; ไม้พาดสำหรับการกระโดดสูง; ที่รองในกีฬากระโดดสูง; แหลน; เบาะสำหรับกีฬากระโดดค้ำถ่อ; ไม้วิ่งผลัด; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับกีฬาทุ่มน้ำหนัก; ลูกทุ่มน้ำหนัก; ปืนปล่อยตัว; รั้วกระโดดวิบาก; ค้อนที่ใช้ขว้าง; เครื่องช่วยฝึกซ้อมกรีฑาประเภทลู่และลาน; ชิ้นส่วนอะไหล่รั้วกระโดดกรีฑา; รั้วสำหรับแข่งกระโดดข้าม; ปุ่มรองเท้าสำหรับลู่และลาน; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับบล็อกสตาร์ทกรีฑา; บล็อกสตาร์ทของนักกรีฑา; ถ่อ
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Στίβος: Δίσκος δισκοβολίας; Οριζόντιες μπάρες για το άλμα εις ύψος; Μαλακά στρώματα προσγείωσης για το άλμα εις ύψος; Ακόντια; Στρώματα επί κοντώ; Σκυτάλες σκυταλοδρομίας; Αξεσουάρ σφαιροβολίας; Σφαίρες ρίψεων για σφαιροβολία; Πιστόλια εκκίνησης; Εμπόδια στιπλ; Σφυριά ρίψεων; Εκπαιδευτικά βοηθήματα στίβου; Ανταλλακτικά εμποδίων στίβου; Εμπόδια στίβου; Παπούτσια με καρφιά για τρέξιμο; Αξεσουάρ βατήρων εκκίνησης στίβου; Μπλοκ εκκίνησης στίβου; Κοντάρια άλματος
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Atlétika: Diszkosz; Magasugráskeresztrudak; Magasugrásgödrök; Gerelyek; Rúdugrásgödrök; Váltóbotok; Súlylökés-kiegészítők; Súlylökés; Indítópisztolyok; Akadályfutó akadályok; Kalapácsdobás; Atlétika edzési segédeszközök; Atlétikai gát cserealkatrészei; Pályaakadályok; Pályatüskék; Atlétikai rajtgép-kiegészítők; Pálya-kezdőblokkok; Ugrórudak
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Atletika: Disk; Letvice za skok v višino; Blazine za skok v višino; Kopja; Blazine za skok s palico; Štafetne palice; Dodatki za krogle za suvanje; Krogle; Štartne pištole; Ovire za zapreke; Kladiva; Pripomočki za vadbo atletike; Nadomestni deli za atletske ovire; Atletske ovire; Šprintarice; Dodatki za štartni blok; Štartni bloki; Palice za skok s palico
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Yleisurheilu: Kiekonheitto; Korkeushyppyrimat; Korkeushyppypaikat; Heittokeihäät; Seiväshyppypaikat; Viestikapulat; Kuulantyönnön lisävarusteet; Kuulantyöntö; Starttipistoolit; Estejuoksuaidat; Moukarinheitto; Yleisurheilun harjoitteluvälineet; Juoksuaitojen varaosat; Aitajuoksu; Yleisurheilun piikkarit; Lähtötelineiden lisävarusteet; Lähtötelineet; Seiväshypyn seipäät
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Atletika: Atletické disky; Laťky pro skok vysoký; Doskočiště pro skok vysoký; Oštěpy; Doskočiště pro skok o tyči; Štafetové kolíky; Příslušenství pro vrh koulí; Vrhací koule; Startovací pistole; Překážky na steeplechase; Vrhací kladiva; Tréninkové pomůcky pro atletiku; Náhradní díly pro atletické překážky; Atletické překážky; Tretry; Příslušenství k atletickým startovním blokům; Startovní bloky; Skokanské tyče
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Lekkoatletyka: Dyski; Poprzeczki do skoku wzwyż; Zeskoki do skoku wzwyż; Oszczepy; Zeskoki do skoku o tyczce; Pałeczki sztafetowe; Akcesoria do pchnięcia kulą; Kule do pchania; Pistolety startowe; Przeszkody do biegu z przeszkodami; Młoty do rzucania; Pomoce treningowe do lekkoatletyki; Części zamienne do płotków lekkoatletycznych; Płotki; Kolce do butów lekkoatletycznych; Akcesoria do bloków startowych; Bloki startowe; Tyczki
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Atletske discipline: Disk; Letvica za skok u vis; Doskočište za skok u vis; Koplja; Doskočište za skok s motkom; Štafete; Dodaci za bacanje kugle; Kugle za bacanje; Startni pištolji; Prepreke za trčanje s preponama; Kladiva za bacanje; Pomagala za vježbanje za atletiku; Zamjenski dijelovi za atletske prepone; Staza s preponama; Klinovi za stazu; Dodaci za startne blokove za stazu; Startni blokovi; Motke za skokove
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Lengvoji atletika: Diskai; Šuolių į aukštį skersiniai; Šuolių į aukštį duobės; Ietys; Šuolių su kartimi duobės; Estafetės lazdelės; Rutulio stūmimo priedai; Rutulio stūmimas; Starto pistoletai; Kliūčių bėgimo barjerai; Kūjai metimui; Lengvosios atletikos treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės; Lengvosios atletikos barjerų atsarginės dalys; Bėgimo kliūtys; Startukai; Lengvosios atletikos starto kaladėlių priedai; Lengvosios atletikos starto kaladėlės; Šuolių kartys
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 田径用品: 铁饼; 跳高横杆; 跳高垫; 标枪; 撑竿跳高垫; 接力棒; 铅球配件; 铅球; 发令枪; 障碍跑跨栏; 链球; 田径训练辅助用品; 田径跨栏替换零件; 跨栏架; 田径钉; 田径起跑器配件; 跑道起跑器; 撑竿
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Atletizm: Diskler; Yüksek Atlama Çıtaları; Yüksek Atlama Çukurları; Cirit; Sırıkla Atlama Çukurları; Bayrak Yarışı Batonları; Gülle atma aksesuarları; Gülleler; Yarış Tabancaları; Su engelli koşu bariyerleri; Fırlatma Çekiçleri; Atletizm Eğitim Araçları; Atletizm engeli yedek parçaları; Koşu Engelleri; Koşu İğneleri; Atletizm çıkış takozu aksesuarları; Koşu Pisti Çıkış Takozları; Atlama Sırıkları
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Atletismo: Acará-disco; Barras de salto em altura; Poços de salto em altura; Dardos de lançamento; Poços de salto com vara; Testemunhos para corrida de estafetas; Acessórios para lançamento do peso; Lançamento do peso; Pistolas de partida; Barreiras de obstáculos de atletismo; Lançamento de martelo; Auxiliares de treino para atletismo; Peças de substituição para barreiras de atletismo; Barreiras para pista; Bicos para pista; Acessórios para blocos de partida de atletismo; Blocos de partida para pista; Varas
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Atletická dráha: Disk; Stojany pre skok do výšky; Doskočisko pre skok do výšky; Oštepy; Doskočisko pre skok o žrdi; Štafetové kolíky; Príslušenstvo pre vrh guľou; Vrh guľou; Štartovacie pištole; Prekážky na steeplechase; Hod kladivom; Atletické tréningové pomôcky; Náhradné diely pre prekážkové dráhy; Atletické prekážky; Tretry; Príslušenstvo pre štartovacie bloky; Štartovacie bloky; Žrde na skok o žrdi
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > 陸上: ディスカス; 高跳びバー; 高跳びピット; やり投げ; 棒高跳びピット; リレーバトン; 砲丸投げアクセサリー; 砲丸投げ; スターターピストル; 障害物競走用ハードル; ハンマー投げ; 陸上競技練習器具; 陸上用ハードル交換用パーツ; ハードル; 陸上競技用スパイク; 陸上用スターティングブロックアクセサリー; スターティングブロック; 棒高跳びポール
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Tracciato e campo atletica: Pesce disco; Aste per salto in alto; Materassini salto in alto; Giavellotti; Cassette imbucata per asta; Testimoni; Accessori per getto del peso; Pesi per getto del peso; Pistole starter; Ostacoli per siepi da atletica; Martelli da lancio; Ausili per l'allenamento di atletica leggera; Componenti di ricambio per ostacoli da atletica; Ostacoli; Picchi; Accessori per blocchi di partenza da atletica; Blocchi di partenza per atletica; Aste per salto
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Atletism: Disc; Bare transversale pentru sărituri în înălțime; Gropi pentru sărituri în înălțime; Sulițe; Gropi pentru sărituri cu prăjina; Ștafete; Accesorii pentru aruncarea greutății; Greutăți pentru aruncarea greutății; Pistoale start; Obstacole pentru cros; Ciocane pentru aruncarea ciocanelor; Articole pentru antrenamente de atletism; Piese de schimb pentru garduri de atletism; Obstacole; Cuie pentru atletism; Accesorii pentru blocstarturi de atletism; Blocuri de start pentru atletism; Prăjini pentru sărituri
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Track & Field: Diskus; Høydestenger; Høydegroper; Kastespyd; Stavspranggroper; Stafettpinner; Tilbehør til kulestøt; Kulestøt; Startpistoler; Hinder for hinderløp; Kasteslegger; Treningshjelpemidler for friidrett; Reservedeler til friidrettshekker; Løpehindre; Løpepigger; Tilbehør til startblokker for friidrett; Startblokker; Høydehoppstenger
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Track & Field: Discus; High Jump Crossbars; High Jump Pits; Javelins; Pole Vault Pits; Relay Batons; Shot Put Accessories; Shot Puts; Starter Pistols; Steeplechase Barriers; Throwing Hammers; Track & Field Training Aids; Track Hurdle Replacement Parts; Track Hurdles; Track Spikes; Track Starting Block Accessories; Track Starting Blocks; Vaulting Poles
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Leichtathletik: Diskusfisch; Hochsprunglatten; Hochsprungmatten; Speere; Stabhochsprungmatten; Staffelstäbe; Zubehör für Kugelstoßen; Kugelstoß-Kugeln; Startpistolen; Hindernisse für den Hindernislauf; Wurfhämmer; Leichtathletik-Trainingshilfen; Ersatzteile für Leichtathletik-Hürden; Hürden; Lauf-Spikes; Zubehör für Startblöcke; Startblöcke; Stabhochsprungstäbe
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Atletismo: Disco; Barras de salto de altura; Colchonetas de salto de altura; Jabalinas; Colchonetas de salto con pértiga; Testigos; Accesorios para lanzamiento de bala; Bolas de lanzamiento de peso; Pistolas de salida; Barreras para carrera de obstáculos; Martillos de lanzamiento; Ayudas para el entrenamiento en pista y campo; Piezas de repuesto para vallas de atletismo; Vallas; Picos de pista; Accesorios para tacos de salida de atletismo; Tacos de salida para pista; Pértigas
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 田徑: 鐵餅; 跳高橫桿; 跳高墊; 擲標槍; 撐竿跳墊; 接力棒; 鉛球配件; 鉛球; 鳴跑槍; 障礙跑欄架; 鏈球用球; 田徑訓練輔助工具; 田徑跨欄替換零件; 田徑跨欄; 田徑釘; 田徑起跑架配件; 起跑器; 撐竿
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 육상 경기: 디스커스; 높이뛰기 가로대; 높이뛰기 착지 매트; 투창용 창; 장대높이뛰기 착지 매트; 릴레이 바통; 투포환 액세서리; 포환; 출발 신호용 총; 장애물 달리기 허들; 해머; 육상 경기 훈련 장비; 육상 허들 교체용 부품; 트랙 허들; 트랙용 스파이크; 육상 스타팅 블록 액세서리; 트랙 출발대; 장대높이뛰기용 장대
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Лека атлетика: Дискове; Напречни греди за висок скок; Ями за висок скок; Копия; Ями за скокове с прът; Щафетни палки; Аксесоари за тласкане на гюле; Гюле; Стартови пистолети; Бариери за стипълчейз; Хвърляне на чук; Помощни средства за лека атлетика; Резервни части за препятствия за лека атлетика; Бягане с препятствия; Шпайкове за бягане; Аксесоари за стартови блокчета за лека атлетика; Стартови блокове за писти; Прътове за скокове
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Легкая атлетика: Метательные диски; Перекладины для прыжков в высоту; Зоны приземления для прыжков в высоту; Метательные копья; Зоны приземления для прыжков с шестом; Эстафетные палочки; Аксессуары для толкания ядра; Ядра для толкания; Стартовые пистолеты; Барьеры для стипль-чеза; Метательные молоты; Тренировочный инвентарь для легкой атлетики; Запасные части для легкоатлетических барьеров; Барьеры для бега; Шипы для обуви для бега; Аксессуары для легкоатлетических стартовых колодок; Стартовые колодки; Шесты для прыжков
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Atletiek: Discusvis; Hoogspringlatten; Hoogspringmatten; Speerwerpen; Polsstokhoogspringmatten; Estafettestokjes; Accessoires voor kogelstoten; Stootkogels; Startpistolen; Steeplechase-hindernissen; Slingerhamers; Atletiektrainingshulpmiddelen; Vervangende onderdelen voor atletiekhorden; Baanhorden; Baanpieken; Accessoires voor atletiekstartblokken; Startblokken voor sportbanen; Hoogspringpolsstokken
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Các môn điền kinh: Cá đĩa; Xà ngang nhảy cao; Đệm nhảy cao; Cây lao; Đệm nhảy sào; Gậy chuyền tay; Phụ kiện đẩy tạ; Tạ ném; Súng đạn nổ; Rào vượt chướng ngại vật điền kinh; Búa ném; Dụng cụ hỗ trợ tập luyện các môn điền kinh; Bộ phận thay thế rào điền kinh; Rào vượt điền kinh; Giày chạy điền kinh; Phụ kiện bàn đạp xuất phát điền kinh; Khối bàn đạp xuất phát; Sào nhảy
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Atletismo: Discos; Sarrafo para salto em altura; Almofada para salto em altura; Dardos de arremesso; Almofada para salto com vara; Bastões de revezamento; Acessórios para arremesso de peso; Arremesso de peso; Pistola de partida; Barreiras para corrida com obstáculos; Martelos para arremesso; Auxílio de treinamento de atletismo; Peças de reposição para barreiras de atletismo; Obstáculos de pista de atletismo; Sapatilhas de atletismo; Acessórios para blocos de partida de atletismo; Blocos de partida para corrida; Vara para salto
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Athlétisme: Discus; Barres de saut en hauteur; Matelas de saut en hauteur; Javelots; Matelas de saut à la perche; Témoins; Accessoires de lancer de poids; Poids de lancer; Pistolets de starter; Haies de steeple; Marteaux à lancer; Aides à l’entraînement d’athlétisme; Pièces de rechange pour haies d'athlétisme; Haies; Crampons d’athlétisme; Accessoires de starting-blocks; Starting-blocks; Perches
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Friidrott: Diskusar; Höjdhoppsribbor; Höjdhoppsbäddar; Kastspjut; Stavhoppsbäddar; Stafettpinnar; Tillbehör för kulstötning; Kulstötningskulor; Startpistoler; Hinder för hinderlöpning; Släggkastningssläggor; Friidrottsträningshjälpmedel; Reservdelar för friidrottshäckar; Häcklöpningshäckar; Spikar för löparskor; Tillbehör för startblock; Startblock för löparbanor; Stavhoppsstavar
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Baneatletik: Diskos; Højdespringsoverliggere; Højdespringsmadrasser; Spydkast; Stangspringsmadrasser; Stafetter; Tilbehør til kuglestød; Kuglestød; Startpistoler; Forhindringer til forhindringsløb; Hammerkast; Baneatletik – træningshjælpemidler; Reservedele til hække til atletik; Hække til hækkeløb; Løbepigge; Tilbehør til startblokke til atletik; Startblokke til løb; Stangspringsstænger